Nebraska, session 109, LB981.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB981 LB981
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 14-102, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
14-102 In addition to the powers granted in section 14-101, cities
of the metropolitan class shall have power by ordinance:
(1) To levy any tax or special assessment authorized by law;
(2) To provide a corporate seal for the use of the city, and also
any official seal for the use of any officer, board, or agent of the
city, whose duties require an official seal to be used. Such corporate
seal shall be used in the execution of municipal bonds, warrants,
conveyances, and other instruments and proceedings as required by law;
(3) To provide all needful rules and regulations for the protection
and preservation of health within the city, including providing for the
enforcement of the use of water from public water supplies when the use
of water from other sources shall be deemed unsafe;
(4) To appropriate money and provide for the payment of debts and
expenses of the city;
(5) To adopt all such measures as may be deemed necessary for the
accommodation and protection of strangers and the traveling public in
person and property;
(6) To punish and prevent the discharge of firearms, fireworks, or
explosives of any description within the city, other than the discharge
of firearms at a shooting range pursuant to the Nebraska Shooting Range
Protection Act;
(7) To regulate the inspection and sale of meats, flour, poultry,
fish, milk, vegetables, and all other provisions or articles of food
exposed or offered for sale in the city;
(8) To require all elected or appointed officers to give bond and
security for the faithful performance of their duties, except that no
officer shall become bonded and secured upon the official bond of another
or upon any bond executed to the city;
(9) To require from any officer of the city at any time a report, in
-2-

LB981 LB981
2026 2026
detail, of the transactions of his or her office or any matter connected
with such office;
(10) To provide for the prevention of cruelty to children and
animals;
(11) To regulate, license, or prohibit the running at large of dogs
and other animals within the city as well as in areas within the
extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of the city; to guard against
injuries or annoyance from such dogs and other animals; and to authorize
the destruction of such dogs and other animals when running at large
contrary to the provisions of any ordinance. Any licensing provision
shall comply with subsection (2) of section 54-603 for service animals;
(12) To provide for keeping sidewalks clean and free from
obstructions and accumulations; to provide for the assessment and
collection of taxes on real estate and for the sale and conveyance
thereof; and to pay the expenses of keeping the sidewalk adjacent to such
real estate clean and free from obstructions and accumulations as
provided by law;
(13) To provide for the planting and protection of shade or
ornamental and useful trees upon streets or boulevards; to assess the
cost of such trees to the extent of benefits upon the abutting property
as a special assessment; to provide for the protection of birds and
animals and their nests; to provide for the trimming of trees located
upon streets and boulevards or when the branches of trees overhang
streets and boulevards when in the judgment of the mayor and city council
such trimming is made necessary to properly light such street or
boulevard or to furnish proper police protection; and to assess the cost
of such trimming upon the abutting property as a special assessment;
(14) To provide for, regulate, and require the numbering or
renumbering of houses along public streets or avenues; and to care for
and control and to name and rename streets, avenues, parks, and squares
within the city;
-3-

LB981 LB981
2026 2026
(15) To require weeds and worthless vegetation growing upon any lot
or piece of ground within the city or its extraterritorial zoning
jurisdiction to be cut and destroyed so as to abate any nuisance
occasioned by such vegetation; to prohibit and control the throwing,
depositing, or accumulation of litter on any lot or piece of ground
within the city or its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction; to require
the removal of such litter so as to abate any nuisance occasioned
thereby. If the owner fails to cut and destroy weeds and worthless
vegetation or remove litter, or both, after notice as required by
ordinance, the city may assess the cost of such destruction or removal
upon the lots or lands as a special assessment. The required notice may
be by publication in the official newspaper of the city and may be
directed in general terms to the owners of lots and lands affected
without naming such owners;
(16) To prohibit and regulate the running at large or the herding or
driving of domestic animals, such as hogs, cattle, horses, sheep, goats,
fowls, or animals of any kind or description within the corporate limits;
to provide for the impounding of all animals running at large, herded, or
driven contrary to such prohibition and regulations; and to provide for
the forfeiture and sale of animals impounded to pay the expense of taking
up, caring for, and selling such impounded animals, including the cost of
advertising and fees of officers;
(17) To regulate the transportation of articles through the streets
and to prevent injuries to the streets from overloaded vehicles;
(18) To prevent or regulate any amusement or practice having a
tendency to annoy persons passing in the streets or on the sidewalks; and
to regulate the use of vehicles propelled by steam, gas, electricity, or
other motive power, operated on the streets of the city;
(19) To regulate or prohibit the transportation and keeping of
gunpowder, oils, and other combustible and explosive articles;
(20) To regulate, license, or prohibit the sale of domestic animals
-4-

LB981 LB981
2026 2026
or of goods, wares, and merchandise at public auction on the streets,
alleys, highways, or any public ground within the city;
(21) To regulate and prevent the use of streets, sidewalks, and
public grounds for signs, posts, awnings, awning posts, scales, or other
like purposes; and to regulate and prohibit the exhibition or carrying or
conveying of banners, placards, advertisements, or the distribution or
posting of advertisements or handbills in the streets or public grounds
or upon the sidewalks;
(22) To provide for the punishment of persons disturbing the peace
by noise, intoxication, drunkenness, or fighting, or otherwise violating
the public peace by indecent or disorderly conduct or by lewd and
lascivious behavior;
(23) To provide for the punishment of vagrants, tramps, street
beggars, prostitutes, disturbers of the peace, pickpockets, gamblers,
burglars, thieves, persons who practice any game, trick, or device with
intent to swindle, and trespassers upon private property;
(24) To prohibit, restrain, and suppress houses of prostitution,
opium joints, gambling houses, prize fighting, dog fighting, cock
fighting, and other disorderly houses and practices, all games and
gambling, and all kinds of indecencies; to regulate and license or
prohibit the keeping and use of billiard tables, bowling alleys, shooting
galleries except as provided in the Nebraska Shooting Range Protection
Act, and other similar places of amusement; and to prohibit and suppress
all lotteries and gift enterprises of all kinds under whatsoever name
carried on, except that nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to
apply to bingo, lotteries, lotteries by the sale of pickle cards, or
raffles conducted in accordance with the Nebraska Bingo Act, the Nebraska
Lottery and Raffle Act, the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, the
Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, or the State Lottery Act;
(25) To make and enforce all police regulations for the good
government, general welfare, health, safety, and security of the city and
-5-

LB981 LB981
2026 2026
the citizens of the city in addition to the police powers expressly
granted by law; in the exercise of the police power, to pass all needful
and proper ordinances and impose fines, forfeitures, and penalties for
the violation of any ordinance; to provide for the recovery, collection,
and enforcement of such fines; and in default of payment to provide for
confinement in the city or county prison or other place of confinement as
may be provided by ordinance;
(26) To prevent immoderate driving on the street;
(27) To establish and maintain public libraries, art galleries, and
museums and to provide the necessary grounds or buildings for such
libraries, galleries, and museums; to purchase books, papers, maps,
manuscripts, works of art, and objects of natural or of scientific
curiosity and instruction for such libraries, galleries, and museums; to
receive donations and bequests of money or property for such libraries,
galleries, and museums in trust or otherwise; and to pass necessary
bylaws and regulations for the protection and government of such
libraries, art galleries, and museums;
(28) To erect, designate, establish, maintain, and regulate
hospitals, houses of correction, jails, station houses, fire engine
houses, asphalt repair plants, and other necessary buildings; to erect,
designate, establish, maintain, and regulate plants for the removal,
disposal, or recycling of garbage and refuse or to make contracts for
garbage and refuse removal, disposal, or recycling, or all of the same;
and to charge equitable fees for such removal, disposal, or recycling, or
all of the same, except as provided by law. The fees collected pursuant
to this subdivision shall be credited to a single fund to be used
exclusively by the city for the removal, disposal, or recycling of
garbage and refuse, or all of the same, including any costs incurred for
collecting the fee. Before any contract for such removal, disposal, or
recycling is let, the city council shall make specifications for such
contract, bids shall be advertised for as now provided by law, and the
-6-

LB981 LB981
2026 2026
contract shall be let to the lowest and best bidder, who shall furnish
bond to the city conditioned upon his or her carrying out the terms of
the contract, the bond to be approved by the city council. Nothing in
this section, and no contract or regulation made by the city council,
shall be so construed as to prohibit any person, firm, or corporation
engaged in any business in which garbage or refuse accumulates as a
byproduct from selling, recycling, or otherwise disposing of his, her, or
its garbage or refuse or hauling such garbage or refuse through the
streets and alleys under such uniform and reasonable regulations as the
city council may by ordinance prescribe for the removal and hauling of
garbage or refuse;
(29) To erect and establish market houses and market places and to
provide for the erection of all other useful and necessary buildings for
the use of the city and for the protection and safety of all property
owned by the city. Such market houses, market places, and buildings may
be located on any street, alley, or public ground or on land purchased
for such purpose;
(30) To prohibit the establishment of additional cemeteries within
the limits of the city; to regulate the registration of births and
deaths; to direct the keeping and returning of bills of mortality; and to
impose penalties on physicians, sextons, and others for any default in
the premises;
(31) To provide for the inspection of steam boilers, electric light
appliances, pipefittings, and plumbings; to regulate their erection and
construction; to appoint inspectors; and to declare their powers and
duties, except as otherwise provided by law;
(32) To enact a fire code and regulate the erection of all buildings
and other structures within the corporate limits; to provide for the
removal of any buildings or structures or additions to buildings or
structures erected contrary to such code or regulations and to provide
for the removal of dangerous buildings; but no such code or regulation
-7-

LB981 LB981
2026 2026
shall be suspended or modified by resolution, nor shall exceptions be
made by ordinance or resolution in favor of any person, firm, or
corporation or concerning any particular lot or building; to direct that
when any building has been damaged by fire, decay, or otherwise, to the
extent of fifty percent of the value of a similar new building above the
foundation, shall be torn down or removed; to prescribe the manner of
ascertaining such damages and to assess the cost of removal of any
building erected or existing contrary to such code or regulations against
the lot or real estate upon which such building or structure is located
or shall be erected or to collect such costs from the owner of any such
building or structure; and to enforce the collection of such costs by
civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction;
(33) To regulate the construction, use, and maintenance of party
walls, to prescribe and regulate the thickness, strength, and manner of
constructing stone, brick, wood, or other buildings and the size and
shape of brick and other material placed in such buildings; to prescribe
and regulate the construction and arrangement of fire escapes and the
placing of iron and metallic shutters and doors in or on such fire
escapes; to provide for the inspection of elevators; to prescribe,
regulate, and provide for the inspection of all plumbing, pipefitting, or
sewer connections in all houses or buildings now or hereafter erected; to
regulate the size, number, and manner of construction of halls, doors,
stairways, seats, aisles, and passageways of theaters and buildings of a
public character, whether now built or hereafter to be built, so that
there may be convenient, safe, and speedy exit in case of fire; to
prevent the dangerous construction and condition of chimneys, fireplaces,
hearths, stoves, stovepipes, ovens, boilers, and heating appliances used
in or about any building and to cause such appliances to be removed or
placed in safe condition when they are considered dangerous; to prevent
the deposit of ashes in unsafe places and to cause such buildings and
enclosures as may be in a dangerous state to be put in a safe condition;
-8-

LB981 LB981
2026 2026
to prevent the disposing of and delivery or use in any building or other
structure of unsuitable building material within the city limits and
provide for the inspection of building materials; to provide for the
abatement of dense volumes of smoke; to regulate the construction of
areaways, stairways, and vaults and to regulate partition fences; and to
enforce proper heating and ventilation of buildings used for schools or
other buildings where large numbers of persons are liable to congregate;
(34) To regulate levees, depots and depot grounds, and places for
storing freight and goods and to provide for and regulate the laying of
tracks and the passage of railways through the streets, alleys, and
public grounds of the city;
(35) To require the lighting of any railway within the city and to
fix and determine the number, size, and style of all fixtures and
apparatus necessary for such lighting and the points of location for such
lampposts. If any company owning or operating such railways shall fail to
comply with such requirements, the city council may cause such lighting
to be done and may assess the expense of such lighting against such
company. Such expense shall constitute a lien upon any real estate
belonging to such company and lying within such city and may be collected
in the same manner as taxes for general purposes;
(36) To provide for necessary publicity and to appropriate money for
the purpose of advertising the resources and advantages of the city;
(37) To erect, establish, and maintain offstreet parking areas on
publicly owned property located beneath any elevated segment of the
National System of Interstate and Defense Highways or portion thereof, or
public property title to which is in the city on May 12, 1971, or
property owned by the city and used in conjunction with and incidental to
city-operated facilities; and to regulate parking on such property by
time limitation devices or by lease;
(38) To acquire, by the exercise of the power of eminent domain or
otherwise, lease, purchase, construct, own, maintain, operate, or
-9-

LB981 LB981
2026 2026
contract for the operation of public passenger transportation systems,
excluding taxicabs, transportation network companies and railroad
systems, including all property and facilities required for such public
passenger transportation systems, within and without the limits of the
city; to redeem such property from prior encumbrance in order to protect
or preserve the interest of the city in such property; to exercise all
powers granted by the Constitution of Nebraska and laws of the State of
Nebraska or exercised by or pursuant to a home rule charter adopted
pursuant thereto, including, but not limited to, receiving and accepting
from the government of the United States or any agency thereof, from the
State of Nebraska or any subdivision thereof, and from any person or
corporation donations, devises, gifts, bequests, loans, or grants for or
in aid of the acquisition, operation, and maintenance of such public
passenger transportation systems; to administer, hold, use, and apply
such donations, devises, gifts, bequests, loans, or grants for the
purposes for which such donations, devises, gifts, bequests, loans, or
grants may have been made; to negotiate with employees and enter into
contracts of employment; to employ by contract or otherwise individuals
singularly or collectively; to enter into agreements authorized under the
Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act; to contract
with an operating and management company for the purpose of operating,
servicing, and maintaining any public passenger transportation systems
the city shall acquire; and to exercise such other and further powers as
may be necessary, incident, or appropriate to the powers of the city; and
(39) In addition to powers conferred elsewhere in the laws of the
state, to implement and enforce an air pollution control program within
the corporate limits of the city under subdivision (23) of section
81-1504 or subsection (1) of section 81-1528, which program shall be
consistent with the federal Clean Air Act, as amended, 42 U.S.C. 7401 et
seq. Such powers shall include without limitation those involving
injunctive relief, civil penalties, criminal fines, and burden of proof.
-10-

LB981 LB981
2026 2026
Nothing in this section shall preclude the control of air pollution by
resolution, ordinance, or regulation not in actual conflict with state
air pollution control regulations; and .
(40) To require any housing authority in a city of the metropolitan
class to comply with any city rental inspection and registration
ordinance, code enforcement, and inspection of residential rental
properties.
Sec. 2. Section 71-1572, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-1572 Sections 71-1572 to 71-15,170 and sections 5 and 6 of this
act shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Housing Agency Act.
Sec. 3. Section 71-1575, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-1575 For purposes of the Nebraska Housing Agency Act:
(1) Affiliate means any corporation, entity, partnership, venture,
syndicate, or arrangement in which a local housing agency participates by
holding an ownership interest or participating in its governance,
including both controlled and noncontrolled affiliates;
(2) Affordable housing means dwelling units that may be rented or
purchased, as the case may be, by persons of eligible income and
qualifying tenants, with or without government assistance;
(3) Agreement means a contract or other legal relations with another
party, whether public or private;
(4) Area of operation means the geographical area within which a
local housing agency may own or operate housing developments as described
in section 71-1588;
(5) Bed bug means a member of the Cimicidae family of parasitic
insects;
(6) (5) City means an incorporated city or village;
(7) (6) Commissioner means a person serving on the governing board
of a local housing agency, including any person identified under prior
-11-

LB981 LB981
2026 2026
law as a member of a housing authority;
(8) (7) Community facilities means real and personal property
suitable for recreational, educational, health, or welfare purposes,
including, but not limited to, buildings, equipment, and parks and other
spaces or structures;
(9) (8) Controlled affiliate means any affiliate of a local housing
agency (a) in which commissioners, officers, employees, and agents of
such agency constitute a majority of the governing body of such entity or
(b) in which such agency holds a majority of the ownership interests;
(10) (9) Development or housing development means and includes all
dwellings and associated appurtenances, including real and personal
property, and all other facilities and improvements of every kind and
description which a local housing agency may own or operate or in which
it may hold an interest under the provisions of the act; all land upon
which such dwellings, appurtenances, and facilities are situated; all
work and activities undertaken by a local housing agency or others
relating to the creation of such property and all tangible and intangible
personal property relating thereto, including all leases, licenses,
agreements, and other instruments; and all rights and obligations arising
thereunder establishing or confirming ownership, title, or right of use
or possession in or to any such property by a local housing agency;
(11) (10) Establishing a housing agency means taking all actions
required under sections 71-1576 to 71-1587 to be taken by the governing
body of a city or county or, in the case of a regional housing agency, by
the governing bodies of all political subdivisions participating therein,
for a housing agency to conduct business and to exercise its powers. In
the case of a housing agency or housing authority existing on January 1,
2000, established means that such agency has been authorized to conduct
business and exercise its powers in accordance with prior law;
(12) (11) Family means a single person or a number of persons that
may, but need not, include children, that a local housing agency accepts
-12-

LB981 LB981
2026 2026
for occupancy of a dwelling, or to which such agency offers or provides
other assistance, as particularly defined in the eligibility and
occupancy standards adopted by the agency;
(13) (12) Guest means any person, not a resident of such
development, who is present within a development, or any person, not a
resident in such dwelling, who is present within a dwelling in a
development, as an invitee of or otherwise with the acquiescence or
consent of a resident of such development or dwelling, as the case may
be;
(14) (13) Hold an interest means ownership, control of, or
participation in an arrangement with respect to a development by a local
housing agency or any affiliate thereof;
(15) (14) Household means a family as defined in subdivision (12)
(11) of this section;
(16) (15) Housing agency or agency means and includes both a local
housing agency established pursuant to sections 71-1576 to 71-1580 and a
regional housing agency established pursuant to sections 71-1581 to
71-1587. Reference in any prior or other law to housing authority is
deemed to refer to housing agency. Wherever the context requires or
permits, housing agency or agency includes controlled affiliates of a
housing agency;
(17) (16) Local housing agency or agency means a public body,
corporate and politic, previously established or to be established by a
city or a county pursuant to the authority provided in the act,
exercising necessary and essential governmental functions for the
purposes stated in the act in matters of statewide concern, although its
operations are local in nature. A local housing agency shall be a
political subdivision of this state, independent from the city or county
which established or establishes it or which may appoint some or all of
its commissioners. Any reference in the act to a local housing agency
includes a housing agency or a regional housing agency, unless the
-13-

LB981 LB981
2026 2026
context clearly otherwise requires. The term local housing agency also
includes any housing authority established under prior law;
(18) (17) Mixed-finance development means a development that is
financed both by funding derived from the private sector and funding
provided by the government that is permitted to be used for the
development of affordable housing;
(19) (18) Mixed-income development means a housing development
intended to be, and which in fact is, occupied both by persons of
eligible income and by other persons, and if such other persons are
living in a development constructed or acquired and substantially
occupied after January 1, 2000, the incomes of such other persons at
initial occupancy shall not exceed one hundred percent of the median
income in the county in which the development is located;
(20) (19) Noncontrolled affiliate means an affiliate in which a
local housing agency participates that is not a controlled affiliate;
(21) (20) Person includes a family;
(22) Pest control professional means a person licensed as a
commercial applicator under the Pesticide Act;
(23) (21) Persons of eligible income means:
(a) With respect to state or federally funded activities or
developments, individuals or families who meet the applicable income
requirements of the state or federal program involved, if any such state
or federal income requirements are applicable, and, if none are so
applicable, then individuals or families who meet the requirements of
subdivision (b) of this subdivision; and
(b) With respect to activities and developments other than those to
which subdivision (a) of this subdivision is applicable, individuals or
families who, in the determination of the local housing agency, lack
sufficient income or assets, taking into account all resources available
to such individuals or families from whatever source derived or
reasonably derivable, to enable them, without undue hardship or
-14-

LB981 LB981
2026 2026
governmental financial assistance, to purchase or rent, as the case may
be, decent, safe, and sanitary dwellings of adequate size, except that
the income of such families shall not exceed eighty percent of the area
median income for families of like size;
(24) (22) Public agency means and includes any: (a) County, city,
village, or township; school, drainage, tax, improvement, or other
district; local housing agency; department, division, or political
subdivision of this state or another state; housing agency, housing
finance agency, or housing trust of this state or another state; and
other agency, bureau, office, authority, or instrumentality of this state
or another state; (b) board, agency, commission, division, or other
instrumentality of a city or county; and (c) board, commission, agency,
department, or other instrumentality of the United States, or any
political subdivision or governmental unit thereof;
(25) (23) Qualifying tenants means persons described in subdivision
(23)(b) (21)(b) of this section and individuals and families whose income
does not exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of the maximum income
standard applicable under subdivision (23)(b) (21)(b) of this section;
(26) (24) Regional housing agency means a public body, corporate and
politic, and a governmental subdivision of this state, formed by two or
more cities, two or more counties, or a combination of cities and
counties, pursuant to the authority provided in sections 71-1581 to
71-1587, exercising necessary and essential governmental functions for
the purposes stated in the act in matters of statewide concern, although
its operations are local or regional in nature. It is a political
subdivision of this state, independent from political subdivisions of
this state which established it or which may appoint some or all of its
commissioners;
(27) (25) Representative means a commissioner, officer, employee, or
agent of a local housing agency; and
(28) (26) Resident means a person residing in a development of a
-15-

LB981 LB981
2026 2026
housing agency pursuant to an agreement with such agency.
Sec. 4. Section 71-15,169, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-15,169 (1) A housing agency for a city of the metropolitan class
shall establish a complaint process. Any resident of an agency property
may file a complaint by any of the following means:
(a) A complaint form filled out online on the housing agency's
website;
(b) A telephone call made to a housing agency; or
(c) A complaint form filled out in person. Such complaint form shall
be made available at designated offices.
(2) The complaint form, whether completed by the complainant online,
in-person, or by a housing agency employee answering a telephone call
complaint, shall include the following information:
(a) The name of the complainant;
(b) Contact information including the telephone number, email
address, and mailing address of the complainant;
(c) The nature of the complaint, including, but not limited to,
whether a maintenance issue, a discrimination claim, or a rent dispute;
and
(d) Relevant dates.
(3) Notice of the right to file a complaint up until the time of an
eviction shall be included on both the online and printed complaint form.
(4) The complainant may provide any supporting documentation with
the complaint, including, but not limited to, photographs or digital
images, receipts, and correspondence.
(5) Upon receipt of the complaint, the agency shall send an
acknowledgment to the complainant by email or regular first-class mail
within five business days. Each complaint shall be assigned a unique case
number for tracking purposes.
(6)(a) (6) The agency shall conduct a thorough investigation of the
-16-

LB981 LB981
2026 2026
complaint, including, but not limited to, interviewing relevant parties,
inspecting property and relevant documents, and reviewing applicable laws
and regulations.
(b) Throughout the investigation, the agency shall provide the
complainant with regular updates on the status of the complaint by email,
telephone, or regular first-class mail.
(c) The agency shall provide tenants with reasonable notice in
advance of entering a dwelling unit for purposes of investigating
complaints, including for inspection, bed bug remediation, or monitoring
in connection with a bed bug complaint.
(7)(a) For any complaint involving an actual or suspected bed bug
infestation:
(i) The agency shall perform an inspection or obtain investigatory
services from a pest control professional within ten days after receiving
the complaint. The inspection or investigatory services shall include any
unit directly adjacent to, above, or below the dwelling unit or common
area from which the original complaint came; and
(ii) Upon a determination of a bed bug infestation, the agency
shall:
(A) Provide all tenants of units affected by the complaint with
notice of the agency's or pest control professional's determination in
connection with such unit within ten days after such determination is
made;
(B) Obtain and provide remedial services from a pest control
professional within twenty-one days after receipt of the complaint; and
(C) Maintain a written record of the complaint and any control
measures provided, including any report of chemicals applied and other
remedies provided by the pest control professional. Such records shall be
maintained for two years.
(b) For all other complaints:
(i) (7) The agency housing authority shall resolve the complaint
-17-

LB981 LB981
2026 2026
within fourteen days after receipt of the complaint. If additional time
is required, the complainant shall be notified and provided with an
updated timeline; and . Throughout the investigation, the agency shall
provide the complainant with regular updates on the status of the
complaint by email, telephone, or regular first-class mail.
(ii) (8) The agency shall notify the complainant of the resolution
of the complaint in writing within five business days after such
resolution. The notice shall include (A) (a) a summary of the
investigation findings, (B) (b) the action taken to address the
complaint, (C) (c) any remedies or compensation provided, (D) (d)
information on how to file a complaint with the political subdivision
responsible for code enforcement, if applicable, and (E) (e) information
about the city's complaint process if the complainant is not satisfied
with the resolution of the complaint.
(8) A complainant who is dissatisfied with the resolution of his or
her complaint may bring an action against the agency under the terms of
his or her lease agreement.
(9) The agency shall invite the complainant to provide feedback on
the complainant's experience with the complaint process, including
suggestions for improvement.
(10) The agency shall monitor complaint trends, analyze root causes,
and report on complaint resolution statistics regularly to identify areas
for improvement. The agency shall submit a report to the commissioners at
every board meeting detailing (a) the number of complaints filed, (b) the
nature of such complaints, (c) the status of completed and pending
inspections, and (d) the number of unfilled inspector positions within
the housing agency. The report shall also be made available to the public
on the agency's website and at the agency's office.
(11) The agency shall inform persons applying for housing about the
complaint process during the resident application process and inform
residents about the complaint process (a) annually, (b) at the time a
-18-

LB981 LB981
2026 2026
complaint is filed, and (c) by posting on the agency's website and on any
public boards in any common housing spaces.
Sec. 5. A housing agency for a city of the metropolitan class shall
have the following responsibilities relating to bed bugs:
(1) Prior to renting a dwelling unit, the agency shall visually
inspect the unit for any evidence of the presence of bed bugs, which may
be indicated by observation of a living bed bug, a bed bug carapace, eggs
or egg casings, or brownish or blood spotting on linens, mattresses, or
furniture;
(2) The agency shall not show, rent, or lease to a prospective
tenant any vacant dwelling unit that the agency knows or reasonably
suspects has a current bed bug infestation;
(3) Prior to renting a dwelling unit, the agency shall disclose to a
prospective tenant if an adjacent unit or units are currently infested
with or are being treated for bed bugs; and
(4) The agency shall be responsible for the costs of investigating
and remediating any bed bug infestation.
Sec. 6. A housing agency for a city of the metropolitan class shall
submit a report every six months to such city of the metropolitan class
and to the Urban Affairs Committee of the Legislature. The report shall
include:
(1) Information regarding any pest control management activities
undertaken during the six-month period covered by the report;
(2) The number of eviction filings during the six-month period
covered by the report;
(3) The number and nature of complaints or grievances filed during
the six-month period covered by the report and their resolutions;
(4) Current vacancy rates; and
(5) Any relevant updates from meetings of the agency's board of
commissioners.
Sec. 7. Original section 71-1575, Reissue Revised Statutes of
-19-

LB981 LB981
2026 2026
Nebraska, and sections 14-102, 71-1572, and 71-15,169, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-20-